cs: Kultivar Atemoya: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Ostatní
th: สายพันธุ์อะเตโมย่า: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kultivar atemoye: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Ostalo
en: Atemoya cultivar: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Other
nb: Atemoya-kultivar: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Annet
pt-PT: Cultivar Atemoya: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Outros
sl-SI: Sorta atemoje: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Drugo
hu: Atemoya-fajta: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Egyéb
pt-BR: Cultivar de atemoia: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Outro
sv: Atemoyasort: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Annat
es: Cultivo de Atemoya: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Otro
vi: Giống cây Atemoya: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Khác
da: Atemoyasort: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Andet
fr: Cultivar d’atemoya: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Autre
ru: Сорт атемойи: African Pride; Брэдли; Дрим; Гефнер; Лиза; Пейдж; Пинкс Маммот; Пристли; Рэд Гефнер; Другое
tr: Atemoya çeşidi: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Diğer
ro-RO: Soiul Atemoya: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Altele
lt-LT: Sodinių anonų veislė: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Kita
de: Atemoya-Sorte: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Sonstige
ja: アテモヤの栽培品種: アフリカンプライド; ブラッドリー; ドリーム; ゲフナー; リサ; ペイジ; ピンクスマモス; プリーストリー; レッドゲフナー; その他
el: Ποικιλία ατεμόγια: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Άλλο
pl: Odmiana atemoi: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Inne
zh-CN: 杂交番荔枝培育品种: 非洲骄傲; 布拉德利; 梦想; 盖夫纳; 丽莎; 佩奇; 粉红猛犸; 普里斯特利; 红盖夫纳; 其他
nl: Atemoya cultivar: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Overige
ko: 아테모야 품종: 아프리칸 프라이드; 브래들리; 드림; 게프너; 리사; 페이지; 핑크스 맘모스; 프리슬리; 레드 게프너; 기타
zh-TW: 鳳梨釋迦品種: 非洲驕傲 (African Pride); 布萊德利 (Bradley); 夢想 (Dream); 蓋夫納 (Gefner); 麗莎 (Lisa); 佩吉 (Page); 粉紅猛獁 (Pink's Mammoth); 普里斯特利 (Priestly); 紅蓋夫納 (Red Gefner); 其他
fi: Atemoyan viljelylajike: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Muu
sk-SK: Odroda ovocia atemoya: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Iné
it: Cultivar di Atemoya: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink’s Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Altro
bg-BG: Сорт атемоя: African Pride; Bradley; Dream; Gefner; Lisa; Page; Pink's Mammoth; Priestly; Red Gefner; Друго